Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201768-977
Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act; act, how cited.

Sections 68-977 to 68-988 shall be known and may be cited as the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act.

Laws 2017, LB578, § 2.